Utah statutes.
53A-25a-106.   Licensing of teachers.

(1)  As part of the licensing process, teachers licensed in the education of blind and visually impaired students shall demonstrate their competence in reading and writing Braille.

(2) (a)  The State Board of Education shall adopt procedures to assess the competencies referred to in Subsection (1), consistent with standards adopted by the National Library Service for the Blind and Physically Handicapped.

(b)  The board shall require teachers of the blind to meet the standards referred to in Subsection (2)(a).

